Illinois, session 104th, HB2675.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 5changing Section 11-315 as follows: 6    (625 ILCS 5/11-315)7    Sec. 11-315. Paved bicycle trail signage. For the purposes 8of this Section, "paved bicycle trail" includes trails 9accommodating bicycle traffic composed of aggregate, asphalt, 10bituminous treatment, concrete, crushed limestone, or any 11combination thereof. The authority having maintenance 12jurisdiction over publicly owned paved bicycle trails in the 13State shall erect permanent regulatory or warning signage 14alerting pedestrians or cyclists of highway crossings, unless 15the crossing is controlled by an official traffic control 16device or sign. If the authority having maintenance 17jurisdiction over publicly owned bicycle trails has actual 18knowledge of an emergency or safety hazard that creates a 19dangerous condition on a publicly owned paved bicycle trail, 20the authority shall take reasonable steps to erect temporary 21signage or other warning markers, including, but not limited 22to, cones, barricades, drums, or painted markings alerting 23pedestrians or cyclists cyclist of the dangerous condition.   HB2675 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 06132 LNS 16165 b1The Department with reference to State highways under its 2jurisdiction, and the local authority with reference to other 3highways under its jurisdiction, shall erect or install 4permanent signage or markings warning vehicular traffic in 5advance of bicycle trail crossings, unless the highway 6approaches to the crossing are controlled by an official 7traffic control device. Permanent signage erected or installed 8along the highways to warn vehicular traffic as part of this 9Section shall conform with the State manual and permanent 10advanced warning signage shall be located at least 150 feet in 11advance of the crossing. This Section shall not apply to 12rustic or primitive trails.13(Source: P.A. 103-386, eff. 1-1-24.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.